Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF915.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 2753YH (5) 91 dg/jh H.F. 915 Section 1. Section 622.9, Code 2025, is amended by striking 1 the section and inserting in lieu thereof the following: 2 622.9 Privileged communications between spouses. 3 Subject to sections 232.74 and 726.4, and any other 4 provision of law to the contrary: 5 1. A spouse shall not be required to be examined in any case 6 as to any communication made by one spouse to the other while 7 married. 8 2. After the marriage relation ceases, a former spouse shall 9 not be required to reveal in testimony any communication made 10 during the marriage. 11 3. If subpoenaed, a person may assert spousal privilege and 12 refuse to reveal any information relating to a communication 13 between the person and another person made while the person and 14 the other person were married. 15